Nevada, session 83, SB320.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 484B.450 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484B.450 1. A person shall not stop, stand or park a vehicle,
except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in
compliance with law or the directions of a police officer or official
traffic-control device, in any of the following places:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, on a sidewalk;
(b) In front of a public or private driveway;
(c) Within an intersection;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(d) Within 15 feet of a fire hydrant in a place where parallel
parking is permitted, or within 20 feet of a fire hydrant if angle
parking is permitted and a local ordinance requires the greater
distance;
(e) On a crosswalk;
(f) [Within] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 484B.520,
within 20 feet of a marked or unmarked crosswalk;
(g) Within 30 feet upon the approach to any official traffic-
control signal located at the side of a highway;
(h) Between a safety zone and the adjacent curb or within 30
feet of points on the curb immediately opposite the ends of a safety
zone;
(i) Within 50 feet of the nearest rail of a railroad;
(j) Within 20 feet of a driveway entrance to any fire station and,
on the side of a highway opposite the entrance to any fire station,
within 75 feet of that entrance;
(k) Alongside or opposite any highway excavation or
obstruction when stopping, standing or parking would obstruct
traffic;
(l) On the highway side of any vehicle stopped or parked at the
edge of or curb of a highway;
(m) Upon any bridge or other elevated structure or within a
highway tunnel;
(n) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, within 5 feet
of a public or private driveway; and
(o) At any place where official traffic-control devices prohibit
stopping, standing or parking.
2. The provisions of paragraph (n) of subsection 1 do not apply
to a person operating a vehicle of the United States Postal Service if
the vehicle is being operated for the official business of the United
States Postal Service.
3. A person may park a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an
electric scooter on a sidewalk provided that the bicycle, electric
bicycle or electric scooter does not impede the normal and
reasonable movement of pedestrians on the sidewalk.
4. A person shall not move a vehicle not owned by the person
into any prohibited area or away from a curb to a distance which is
unlawful.
5. A local authority may place official traffic-control devices
prohibiting or restricting the stopping, standing or parking of
vehicles on any highway where in its opinion stopping, standing or
parking is dangerous to those using the highway or where the
vehicles which are stopping, standing or parking would unduly
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
interfere with the free movement of traffic. It is unlawful for any
person to stop, stand or park any vehicle in violation of the
restrictions stated on those devices.
Sec. 2. NRS 484B.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.520 1. A local authority may , [erect,] pursuant to
ordinance [,] :
(a) Erect official traffic-control devices regulating the stopping,
standing or parking of vehicles on any highway under its
jurisdiction [.] ; or
(b) Establish distances greater than those prescribed by
paragraph (f) of subsection 1 of NRS 484B.450 related to
stopping, standing or parking near a marked or unmarked
crosswalk, if the difference is necessary for the safety of the
community and the local authority erects official traffic-control
devices to provide notice of the distance applicable to the
jurisdiction.
2. [When devices are erected giving notice thereof, it] It is
unlawful for any person to stop, stand or park a vehicle [for longer
than the time designated by any such sign.] in violation of the
regulations stated on any official traffic-control device.
3. A law enforcement officer may only enforce the
prohibition related to stopping, standing or parking within a
specified distance of a marked or unmarked crosswalk as
prescribed by paragraph (b) of subsection 1 or paragraph (f) of
subsection 1 of NRS 484B.450 if notice relating to the prohibition
was provided by an official traffic-control device and such
enforcement is limited to the issuance of a warning.
Sec. 3. NRS 484B.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.520 1. A local authority may, pursuant to ordinance:
(a) Erect official traffic-control devices regulating the stopping,
standing or parking of vehicles on any highway under its
jurisdiction; or
(b) Establish distances greater than those prescribed by
paragraph (f) of subsection 1 of NRS 484B.450 related to stopping,
standing or parking near a marked or unmarked crosswalk, if the
difference is necessary for the safety of the community and the local
authority erects official traffic-control devices to provide notice of
the distance applicable to the jurisdiction.
2. It is unlawful for any person to stop, stand or park a vehicle
in violation of the regulations stated on any official traffic-control
device.
[3. A law enforcement officer may only enforce the prohibition
related to stopping, standing or parking within a specified distance
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
of a marked or unmarked crosswalk as prescribed by paragraph (b)
of subsection 1 or paragraph (f) of subsection 1 of NRS 484B.450 if
notice relating to the prohibition was provided by an official traffic-
control device and such enforcement is limited to the issuance of a
warning.]
Sec. 4. 1. This section and sections 1 and 2 of this act
become effective on October 1, 2025.
2. Section 3 of this act becomes effective on January 1, 2027.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)